Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.500

Merger, consolidation, conversion, etc.—Approval—Concentration limits.

(1) A savings bank may merge with, consolidate with, convert into, acquire a branch or branches of, or sell its branch or branches to any depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. Sec. 461, any financial institution chartered or authorized to do business under the laws of any state, territory, province, or other jurisdiction of the United States or another nation, or any holding company or subsidiary of such an institution, subject to the approval of (a) the director of financial institutions if the surviving institution is one chartered under Title *30, 31, 32, or 33 RCW, or (b) if the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or other depository institution that is federally chartered under the laws of the United States, the federal regulatory authority having jurisdiction over the transaction under the applicable laws, or (c) if the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or other depository or financial institution that is chartered under the laws of another state or territory of the United States, the regulatory authority having jurisdiction over that transaction under the applicable laws, or (d) if the surviving institution is to be a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, or other depository or financial institution that is chartered under the laws of a nation other than the United States or of a state, territory, province, or other jurisdiction of such nation, the director of financial institutions, or (e) if the surviving institution is to be a bank holding company or financial holding company, the Federal Reserve Board or its successor under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1842 (a) and (d).

(2) In the case of a liquidation, acquisition, merger, consolidation, or conversion of a converted savings bank, chapter 32.34 RCW shall apply.

(3) The concentration limits applicable to these transactions, pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(C) with respect to interstate transactions, shall be those imposed pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(c)(5), as applied by the federal regulatory authority having jurisdiction over that transaction under the applicable law, in lieu of the concentration limits of 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(B).

[ 2003 c 24 s 9; 1999 c 14 s 30; 1996 c 2 s 28. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 111; 1994 c 92 s 404; 1985 c 56 s 31; 1981 c 85 s 99.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.